Alabama, session 2026rs, HB617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the term
"solar power facility" means a large-scale, ground-mounted
installation of photovoltaic panels that are designed to
generate electricity using solar power for use off-site or
sale to a third party, including all equipment and facilities
required to operate the facility and transmit generated
electricity.
(b) For one year after the effective date of this act,
a solar power facility not operating or under construction on
the effective date of this act may not be constructed or
operated.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1